North Carolina statutes. Chapter 28A. Administration of Decedents’ Estates.
Article 14. Notice to Creditors.

§ 28A-14-1.
Notice for claims.

Every personal representative and collector after the granting of letters shall notify all persons, firms, and corporations having claims against the decedent to present their claims to the personal representative or collector, on or before a day to be
named in the notice, which day must be at least three months from the day of the first publication or posting of the notice. The notice shall set out a mailing address for the personal representative or collector. The notice shall
be published once a week for four consecutive weeks in a newspaper qualified to publish legal advertisements, if any such newspaper is published in the county. If there is no newspaper published in the county, but there is a newspaper
having general circulation in the county, then at the option of the personal representative, or collector, the notice shall be published once a week for four consecutive weeks in the newspaper having general circulation in the
county and posted at the courthouse or the notice shall be posted at the courthouse and four other public places in the county. Personal representatives are not required to publish or mail notice to creditors if the only asset
of the estate consists of a claim for damages arising from death by wrongful act. When any collector or personal representative of an estate has published or mailed the notice provided for by this section, no further publication
or mailing shall be required by any other collector or personal representative.

Prior to filing the proof of notice required by

G.S. 28A-14-2

, every personal representative and collector shall personally deliver or send by first class mail to the last known address a copy of the notice required by subsection (a) of this section to all persons, firms,
and corporations having unsatisfied claims against the decedent that are actually known or can be reasonably ascertained by the personal representative or collector within 75 days after the granting of letters and, if at the time
of the decedent’s death the decedent was receiving medical assistance as defined by G.S. 108A-70.5(b), to the Division of Health Benefits of the Department of Health and Human Services. No notice, however, is required to be delivered
or mailed with respect to any claim that is recognized as a valid claim by the personal representative or collector.

The personal representative or collector may personally deliver or mail by first class mail a copy of the notice required by subsection (a) of this section to all creditors of the estate whose names and addresses can be ascertained with reasonable diligence.
If the personal representative or collector in good faith believes that the notice required by subsection (b) of this section to a particular creditor is or may be required and gives notice based on that belief, the personal representative
or collector is not liable to any person for giving the notice, whether or not the notice is actually required by subsection (b) of this section. If the personal representative or collector in good faith fails to give notice required
by subsection (b) of this section, the personal representative or collector is not liable to any person for the failure.

History.
1868-9, c. 113, s. 29; 1881, c. 278, s. 2; Code, ss. 1421, 1422; Rev., s. 39; C.S., s. 45; 1945, c. 635; 1949, c. 47; c. 63, s. 1; 1955, c. 625; 1961, c. 26, s. 1; c. 741, s. 1; 1973, c. 1329, s. 3; 1977, c. 446, s. 1; 1985,
c. 319; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1077, s. 1; 1989, c. 378, s. 1; c. 770, s. 8; 1991, c. 282, s. 1; 2013-378, s. 3; 2019-81, s. 15(a); 2021-88, s. 9(f).

Cross References.

As to cost of publication, see

G.S. 1-596

.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-378, s. 3, effective October 1, 2013, added “and, if at the time of the decedent’s death the decedent was receiving medical assistance as defined by G.S. 108A-70.5(b)(1), to the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Medical
Assistance” at the end of the first sentence of subsection (b).

Session Laws 2019-81, s. 15(a), effective July 1, 2019, substituted “Division of Health Benefits” for “Division of Medical Assistance” in subsection (b).

Session Laws 2021-88, s. 9(f), effective July 22, 2021, rewrote the first sentence of subsection (a); rewrote subsection (b); and substituted “the failure” for “such failure” in the last sentence of subsection (c).

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Notice to Creditors in Estate Proceedings: What Process Is Due?,” see 63 N.C.L. Rev. 659 (1985).

§ 28A-14-1.1.
Validation of certain notices.

Any notice to creditors published or posted under

G.S. 28A-14-1

which did not, in the advertisement, name the day after which claims could not be presented is validated.

This section applies to all notices published and posted between October 1, 1975, and January 1, 1991, except that it does not affect any pending litigation or any litigation instituted within 90 days of January 1, 1991.

History.
1981, c. 96, ss. 1, 2; 1987, c. 277, s. 8; 1989, c. 390, s. 8; 1991, c. 489, s. 8.

§ 28A-14-2.
Proof of notice.

A copy of the notice directed by G.S. 28A-14-1(a) to be posted or published, together with an affidavit or affidavits of one of the persons authorized by G.S. 1-600(a) to make affidavits to the effect that such notice was posted or published in accordance
with G.S. 28A-14-1(a), and an affidavit of the personal representative or collector, or the attorney for the personal representative or collector, to the effect that a copy of the notice was personally delivered or mailed to each creditor
entitled to notice in accordance with G.S. 28A-14-1(b) shall be filed in the office of the clerk of superior court by the personal representative or collector at the time the inventory required by

G.S. 28A-20-1

is filed. The copy of the notice, together with the affidavit or affidavits, shall be deemed a record of the court and a copy thereof, duly certified by the clerk of superior court, shall be received as prima facie evidence
of the fact of publication or mailing in all the courts of this State.

History.
1868-9, c. 113, s. 31; Code, s. 1423; Rev., s. 40; C.S., s. 46; 1951, c. 1005, s. 3; 1961, c. 26, s. 2; 1973, c. 1329, s. 3; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1077, s. 2; 1989, c. 378, s. 2.

§ 28A-14-3.
Personal notice to creditor.

The personal representative or collector may cause the notice to be personally served on any creditor.

History.
1868-9, c. 113, s. 32; Code, s. 1424; 1885, c. 96; Rev., s. 41; C.S., s. 47; 1961, c. 741, s. 2; 1973, c. 1329, s. 3; 1977, c. 446, s. 1; c. 798; 1979, c. 509, s. 2.